New Jersey, session 221, A4495.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Division means the Division of Child Protection and Permanency in the Department of Children and Families. Federal benefits means any cash payments from the federal government for which a child may be eligible, including but not  limited to, Social Security benefits pursuant to Title II of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.401 et seq.) and Title XVI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1381 et seq.), and Veterans Administration benefits. Representative payee has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (j) of Section 405 of Title II of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.405(j)(1)(A)) and in paragraph (a) of Section 1383 of Title XVI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1383(a)(2)(A)(ii)(I)). 2.    a.  In the case of a child in the custody of the division, the Department of Children and Families shall make a determination as to whether the child is currently receiving, or is eligible for, federal benefits within sixty days after the child is placed in the divisions custody. b.    If the department determines that the child is eligible or may be eligible for federal benefits, the department shall apply for such benefits on behalf of the child, after notifying the child, the childs attorney, the childs parent, provided parental rights have not been terminated, or the childs guardian. 3.    a.  If a child is receiving federal benefits before the division assumes custody of the child, or if the Department of Children and Families applies for benefits on the childs behalf, the department shall: (1)   identify, in consultation with the child and the childs attorney, a representative payee, in accordance with 20 C.F.R. 404.2021 and 20 C.F.R. 416.621, who shall apply to become the representative payee for the childs benefits; or (2)   apply to become the representative payee for the childs benefits, provided no other suitable candidate is available. b.    If the department is appointed to serve as the childs representative payee under subsection a., the department: (1)   is prohibited from using the childs federal or other benefits, savings, or assets to offset the States costs for the childs care; and (2)   may use the childs federal or other benefits, savings, or assets for the childs current unmet needs beyond the amount that the department is obligated, required, or agrees to pay, or may reserve the benefits, savings, or assets for the childs future needs. 4.    a.  If the Department of Children and Families is appointed to serve as the representative payee of a child under the custody of the division, the department shall establish an account, at a federally insured financial institution, to reserve and use the childs federal benefits in the childs best interest for current unmet and future needs, in a manner consistent with federal and State asset and resource limits. b.    The account established under subsection a. may include, but shall not be limited to: (1)   a special needs trust, established pursuant to P.L.2015, c.276 (C.3B:31-37); (2)   an Achieving a Better Life Experience Account, established pursuant to P.L.2015, c.185 (C.52:18A-250 et seq.), in accordance with section 529A of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.529A; or (3)   any other trust account determined not to interfere with the income or asset limitations for any benefit program for which the child is eligible. c.     The department shall provide an annual accounting of the use, application, or conservation of the federal benefits of a child under the custody of the division to the child, the childs attorney, the childs parent, provided parental rights have not been terminated, or the childs legal guardian. 5.    The Department of Children and Families shall annually review whether an appropriate individual, other than the department, is available to serve as the representative payee for a child under the custody of the division, and, if such a person is available, and with the agreement of the child and the childs attorney, petition to have this individual appointed as the childs representative payee. 6.    a.  The Department of Children and Families shall notify a child, who is in the custody of the division, the childs parent, provided parental rights have not been terminated, or the childs legal guardian of any application, decision, or appeal related to the childs federal benefits. b.    In the case of a denial of the childs federal benefits, the department shall consult with the childs attorney and appeal the denial, provided doing so is in the childs best interest. 7.    The Department of Children and Families shall annually review the cases of children who are in the custody of the division to determine whether a child may have become eligible for federal benefits after the departments initial assessment of the childs eligibility. 8.    Upon the childs exit from the divisions custody, and termination of the Department of Children and Families responsibility for the child, the department shall release any remaining funds to the childs credit, pursuant to the requirements of the original funding source or, in the absence of any such requirements, shall release the remaining funds to: a.     the child, if the child is aged 18 years or older or is emancipated; or b.    the childs parent or legal guardian, if the child is a minor and is not emancipated. 9.    The Commissioner of Children and Families, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 10.  This act shall take effect immediately.